Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CITY OF CARVER.new text end new text begin $3,350,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to the city of Carver for capital improvements to restore the Carver levee, protecting an important historic district in Minnesota from floodwaters of the Minnesota River. This levee restoration must meet the requirements of Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) certification. The project includes predesign, design, engineering, land acquisition, and construction of capital improvements, including raising the height of the Carver levee, constructing internal drainage, establishing maintainable setbacks to adjacent structures, and certification by FEMA. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 1, section 7, subdivision 8, and for the same purpose. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end